Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-409
Interns; grants; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-409 to 81-411:

(1) Department means the Department of Labor;

(2) Internship means employment of a student in a professional or technical position for a limited period of time, by a business in Nebraska, in which the student:

(a) Gains valuable applied work experiences;

(b) Increases knowledge and develops connections that assist with career decisionmaking;

(c) Has the opportunity to match with an employer seeking talent to evaluate, develop, and retain; or

(d) Receives credited or certified training for skilled positions that will help resolve skilled workforce shortages and create talent pipelines for Nebraska industries; and

(3) Student means any person who:

(a) Is in eleventh or twelfth grade in a public or private high school or a school which elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements in Nebraska;

(b) Is enrolled in a college, a university, a certified training institution, or some other institution of higher education; or

(c) Applies for an internship within twelve months following graduation from a public or private secondary school, a school that elects pursuant to section 79-1601 not to meet accreditation or approval requirements in Nebraska, or a college, a university, a certified training institution, or some other institution of higher education.

Laws 2011, LB386, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB476, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB1093, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 81-1210.01;

Laws 2026, LB847, § 25.
July 18, 2026